Utah statutes.
77-5-7.   Senators to be sworn -- Two-thirds required for proceedings.
At the time and place appointed, and before the Senate proceeds to act on the
impeachment, the secretary shall administer to the president of the Senate,
and the president of the Senate shall administer to each of the members of the
Senate then present, an oath or affirmation to do justice according to law and
the evidence and no member of the Senate shall act or vote on the impeachment,
or any question arising on it without taking the oath or affirmation and being
present during the proceedings. No proceedings shall be conducted unless at
least two-thirds of the senators elected and entitled to vote are present.
